District of Columbia statutes.
7-2071.10

Requirements for health benefits plans and HealthCare Alliance.

(a)

Health benefits plans and the HealthCare Alliance shall:

(1)

Include in their marketing and membership materials information regarding the availability of the Ombudsman Program;

(2)

Send annually to their members notification of the availability of the Ombudsman Program; and

(3)

Provide members the telephone number of the Ombudsman Program upon request.

(b)

A health benefits plan may use the one-page, easy-to-read flyer developed by the Ombudsman Program to describe its services to meet the notice requirements under subsection (a)(1) and (2) of this section.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-331, § 11, 52 DCR 1981